Utah statutes.
63M-1-1001.   Definitions.

As used in this part, "biotechnology" is:

(1)  the modification of living organisms by recombinant DNA techniques; and

(2)  a means to accomplish, through genetic engineering, the same kinds of modifications accomplished through traditional genetic techniques such as crossbreeding.

